Hawaii, session 2026, SB259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  In 2022, the thirty-first legislature enacted House Bill 1991, House Draft 2, Senate Draft 2, Committee Draft 1, and former governor David Ige signed Act 108 into law, which amended section 486M-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and required pawnbrokers and secondhand dealers, within counties that have a population base of five hundred thousand or more, to submit their records of transaction electronically to a database at the discretion of the chief of police for that county. The legislature finds that chapters 445 and 486M, Hawaii Revised Statutes are not definitive in regard to the recordkeeping requirements for secondhand dealers, which they are required to retain at their business. The legislature also finds that electronic submissions and filings provide a more effective system to streamline, simplify, and modernize business management, reduce unnecessary paper and electronic waste, and are less intrusive on the environment. The legislature also finds that pawnbrokers and secondhand dealers stimulate local business economies by reusing or recycling unwanted articles that have value. If these articles of resale are not properly marked, they may ultimately end up in the waste management system. The legislature intends to support businesses that reuse or recycle articles, such as pawnbrokers and secondhand dealers, without the undue burden of the responsibility of retaining records of transaction, whether electronic or paper form, for an unspecified amount of time. The legislature intends to establish a recordkeeping requirement for secondhand dealers and records they are required to retain at their place of business. Accordingly, the legislature intends to amend, standardize, and codify existing statutory requirements within chapter 445, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for pawnbrokers and records they are required to retain at their place of business. This establishes a reasonable time period in which law enforcement may pursue criminal investigations and take enforcement actions without imposing an undue burden on pawnbrokers and secondhand dealers by requiring retention of documents that are unnecessary and wasteful. SECTION 2.  Chapter 445, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part VII to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§445- Recordkeeping.  A record of all secondhand transactions shall be kept on the secondhand dealer's premises and open to inspection at any time by the treasurer, chief of police, or the treasurer or chief of police's authorized representative, for a period of two years after the date of sale." SECTION 3.  Section 445-134.17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§445-134.17[]]  Recordkeeping.  A [copy] record of all pawn transactions shall be kept on the pawnshop premises and open to inspection at any time by the [proper authorities] treasurer,  chief of police, or the treasurer or chief of police's authorized representative, for a period of [one year] two years after the maturity date." SECTION 4.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 5.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request